Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 2 Judicial Determination of Heirs and Interests

53-2-20.
Jurisdiction of probate or superior court.

The identity or interest of any heir may be resolved judicially upon application to the probate court that has jurisdiction by virtue of a pending administration or that would have jurisdiction in the event of an administration of the estate of the decedent. Alternatively, the petition may be filed in the superior court of the county where the probate court having jurisdiction, as defined in this Code section, is located; provided, however, that, if the petition is filed in connection with a contested proceeding to determine a purported heir’s entitlement to a year’s support from the decedent’s estate pursuant to Chapter 3 of this title, such petition must be filed in the probate court having jurisdiction. The proceedings for the determination of such questions shall conform to the requirements set forth in this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-2-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-2/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, added the proviso at the end of the second sentence.

53-2-21.
Filing of petition.

Any personal representative, guardian, conservator, committee, trustee, fiduciary, or other person having a status which by operation of law or written instrument devolves upon such person a duty of distributing property to heirs may file a petition for determination of heirship as provided in Code Section 53-2-20. The petition shall allege the names, addresses, ages, and relationship, so far as known to the petitioner, of all parties at interest other than creditors and the nature and character of such interests. The petition shall further allege whether the petitioner has reason to apprehend that there may be others entitled to participate in the distribution whose names are unknown to the petitioner.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-2-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-2-22.
Petition by person claiming to be heir or distributee.

Any individual claiming to be an heir or any person in any way interested as a distributee in any property under the laws of intestacy may apply to either the probate court or the superior court specified in Code Section 53-2-20 to have the claim of heirship and quantity of interest established. The petition in such a case shall contain the same averments as to all parties at interest required of persons filing under Code Section 53-2-21 with the person charged with the duty of distribution being named as a party.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-2-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-2-23.
Superior court procedure.

Upon the filing in a superior court of a petition described in Code Section 53-2-21 or 53-2-22, service on the parties in interest shall be effected in the same manner as prescribed in cases in which equitable relief is sought; and the case shall thereafter proceed to judgment in the manner provided for such cases by the rules of practice in the superior courts.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-2-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-2-24.
Probate court procedure.

Upon the filing in a probate court of a petition described in Code Section 53-2-21 or 53-2-22, a citation shall be issued and parties in interest shall be served as provided in Chapter 11 of this title.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-2-24

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-2-25.
Intervention by person claiming to be heir or distributee.

Any individual claiming to be an heir or any person in any way interested as a distributee and who is not named as such in any petition filed and pending under this article may file a motion to intervene in the proceeding.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-2-25

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For article with annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (2021).

53-2-26.
Effect of findings of court.

In the absence of fraud, the findings of the superior court or the probate court shall be binding and conclusive as to every person and as to every issue decided.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-2-26

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-2-27.
DNA testing for kinship; procedure; costs.

When the kinship of any party in interest to a decedent is in controversy in any proceeding under this article, a probate court or superior court may order the removal and testing of deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) samples from the remains of the decedent and from any party in interest whose kinship to the decedent is in controversy for purposes of comparison and determination of the statistical likelihood of such kinship. The court may order the disinterment of the decedent’s remains if reasonably necessary to obtain such samples.

The order may be made only on motion for good cause shown and upon notice to all parties in interest and shall specify the time, place, manner, conditions, and scope of the removal and testing of samples, and the person or persons by whom it is to be made. Such motion, when made by a party in interest, shall be supported by affidavit setting forth:

The factual basis for a reasonable belief that the party in interest whose kinship to the decedent is in controversy is or is not so related; and

If disinterment of the decedent’s remains is sought, the factual basis for a reasonable belief that reliable DNA samples from the decedent are not otherwise reasonably available from any other source.

Upon request, the movant shall deliver to all parties in interest a copy of a detailed written report of the tester and of any other expert involved in the determination of such statistical likelihood setting out his or her findings, including the results of all tests made and conclusions or opinions based thereon.

The costs of obtaining and testing of such samples, including the costs of disinterment and reinterment of the remains of the decedent, if necessary, as well as the costs of providing the report, shall be assessed against and paid by the moving party.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-2-27

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1081, § 1; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-3/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subsection (a), inserted “probate court or” in the first sentence, deleted “superior” preceding “court” in the second sentence, and deleted the last sentence which read: “If the proceedings are pending in the probate court, the motion shall be transferred to the superior court for determination.”

Law reviews.

For note on the 2002 enactment of this Code section, see 19 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 347 (2002).

For annual survey of law on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 365 (2010).

For article with annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (2021).